Arkansas, session 2025, HB1682.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 20-57-103 is repealed.
20-57-103. Donors of canned food, live food, or perishable food not
liable — Exception — Definitions.
(a) As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) “Canned food” means any food commercially processed and
prepared for human consumption;
(2) “Live food” means live or recently deceased animals, such as
wild game or farm stock, that may be legally processed for use as food for
human consumption; and
(3)(A) “Perishable food” means any food which may spoil or
otherwise become unfit for human consumption because of its nature, type, or
physical condition.
(B) “Perishable food” includes without limitation fresh
*CEB205*
03/04/2025 7:45:30 PM CEB205

HB1682
and processed meats, poultry, seafood, dairy products, bakery products, eggs
in the shell, fresh fruits and vegetables, and foods which have been
packaged, refrigerated, or frozen.
(b) The provisions of this section shall govern all good faith
donations of perishable food which is not readily marketable due to
appearance, freshness, grade, surplus, or other conditions, but nothing in
this section shall restrict the authority of any appropriate agency to
regulate or ban the use of the food for human consumption.
(c) All other provisions of law notwithstanding, a good faith donor of
canned food, live food, or perishable food which is apparently fit for human
consumption at the time it is donated to a bona fide charitable or not-for-
profit organization for free distribution or distribution at a nominal cost
is not subject to criminal or civil liability arising from an injury or death
due to the condition of the food unless the injury or death is a direct
result of the gross negligence, recklessness, or intentional misconduct of
the donor.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code Title 20, Chapter 57, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
20-57-105. Arkansas Good Neighbor Act — Food donation liability and
immunity — Definitions.
(a) This section shall be known and may be cited as the "Arkansas Good
Neighbor Act".
(b) As used in this section:
(1) "Food" means any raw, cooked, processed, or prepared edible
substance, ice, beverage, or ingredient used or intended for use in whole or
in part for human consumption;
(2) “Food product” means any substance in liquid, concentrated,
solid, frozen, dried, dehydrated, or other form that is sold for ingestion or
chewing by humans and is consumed for its taste, nutritional value, or both;
(3) “Gleaner” means a person who harvests an agriculture crop
that has been donated by the owner for:
(A) Free distribution to people; or
(B) Donation to a church, religious organization, or other
nonprofit organization for ultimate distribution to people; and
(4)(A) “Person” means an individual, corporation, partnership,
03/04/2025 7:45:30 PM CEB205

HB1682
organization, association, or governmental entity.
(B) "Person" includes:
(i) A retail grocer, wholesaler, hotel, motel,
restaurant, caterer, farmer, nonprofit food distributor, school, church,
religious organization, or hospital; and
(ii) An officer, director, partner, deacon, trustee,
council member, or other elected or appointed individual responsible for the
governance of a corporation, partnership, organization, association, or
governmental entity.
(c)(1) If a food or food product donated by a person or gleaner to a
church, religious organization, or other nonprofit organization for the
purpose of consumption by individuals the church, religious organization, or
other nonprofit organization serves does not meet consumer safety standards
imposed by federal, state, or local laws, rules or regulations or is not
readily marketable due to appearance, freshness, grade, surplus, or other
conditions, the person or the gleaner who donates the food or food product is
not subject to civil or criminal liability if the person or gleaner:
(A) Makes the donation in good faith; and
(B) Informs the church, religious organization, or other
nonprofit organization of the condition of the food or food product at the
time of donation to the best of his or her knowledge.
(2) If a food or food product donated to and distributed by a
church, religious organization, or other nonprofit organization for the
purpose of consumption by individuals the church, religious organization, or
other nonprofit organization serves does not meet consumer safety standards
imposed by federal law or regulation or state law or rule, or is not readily
marketable due to appearance, freshness, grade, surplus, or other conditions,
the church, religious organization, or other nonprofit organization is not
subject to civil or criminal liability if the church, religious organization,
or other nonprofit organization:
(A) Distributes the food or food product in good faith;
and
(B) Informs the individuals who receive the food or food
product of the condition of the food or food product at the time of serving
or distribution to the best of the church's, religious organization's, or
other nonprofit's knowledge.
03/04/2025 7:45:30 PM CEB205

HB1682
(d) This section does not restrict:
(1) Criminal or civil liability that is a direct result of gross
negligence, recklessness, or intentional misconduct; or
(2) The authority of any appropriate agency to regulate or ban
the use of a food or food product that is known to not be fit for human
consumption.
(e) All producers or distributors of food or food products that are
licensed or permitted by the state shall be provided notice of the food
donation liability and immunity under this section.



























03/04/2025 7:45:30 PM CEB205